Delaware, session 153, HB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 65, Title 30 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6501. Definitions. As used in this chapter: (10) âNursing facilityâ means a nursing facility as defined and licensed pursuant to Chapter 11 of Title 16. As used in this chapter, the term ânursing facilityâ shall include for-profit and nonprofit entities but shall exclude the Delaware Veterans Home and any state, federal or other public government-owned facilities and any facilities that exclusively serve children. maintain an average daily census of 80 percent or more serving children under 21 years of age.